Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.23, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorization. The commissioner of veterans affairs deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin shallnew text end provide, deleted text begin within available funds anddeleted text end upon request of a county veterans service officer or any congressionally chartered veterans organization, an appropriate marker for the grave of any veteran as defined under section 197.447. Any marker provided must be used for memorial purposes to permanently mark the grave of a veteran buried within the limits of the state. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for the purposes of providing grave markers under Minnesota Statutes, section 197.23, subdivision 1. This is an ongoing appropriation. new text end